District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.03

Payment for sexual assault forensic examination kits.

The hospital shall not bill a sexual assault victim for costs associated with the administration of a sexual assault forensic examination kit or for the kit itself.

History

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 203, 61 DCR 5913